Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0567.
people of the state of michigan enact: 1 2 3 4 5 Sec. 13a. (1) Until December 31, 2019, application fees for an individual, partnership, firm, corporation, association, governmental organization, or nongovernmental organization licensed or seeking licensure under this act are as follows: (a) Application fee for a temporary license: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 (i) Family home $ 65.00 (ii) Small group home (1-6) 105.00 (iii) Small group home (7-12) 135.00 (iv) Large group home 170.00 (v) Congregate facility 220.00 (vi) Camp 40.00 (b) Application fee for subsequent licenses: (i) Family home $ 25.00 (ii) Small group home (1-6) 25.00 (iii) Small group home (7-12) 60.00 (iv) Large group home 100.00 (v) Congregate facility 150.00 (vi) Camp 25.00 (2) Until December 31, 2019, fees collected under this act shall be credited to the general fund of the state to be appropriated by the legislature to the department for the enforcement of this act. (1) (3) Application Beginning January 1, 2022, application fees for an individual, partnership, firm, corporation, association, governmental organization, or nongovernmental organization licensed or seeking licensure under this act for a temporary or renewal license are as follows: (a) Beginning January 1, 2020, as follows: (i) Family home (3-6) $ 85.00 (ii) Small group home (3-6) 130.00 (iii) Small group home (7-12) 170.00 (iv) Large group home 320.00 (v) Congregate facility (renewal only) 360.00 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (vi) Camp 120.00 (b) Beginning January 1, 2022, as follows: (a) (i) Family home $ 100.00 (b) (ii) Small group home (3-6) 150.00 (c) (iii) Small group home (7-12) 200.00 (d) (iv) Large group home 500.00 (e) (v) Congregate facility (renewal only) 500.00 (f) (vi) Camp 200.00 (2) The adult foster care facilities licenses fund is created in the state treasury. (3) The state treasurer shall credit all fees collected under this act to the fund and may receive money or other assets from any source for deposit into the fund. The state treasurer shall credit to the fund interest and earnings from fund investments. (4) Money in the fund at the close of the fiscal year must remain in the fund and not lapse to the general fund. (5) The department is the administrator of the fund for auditing purposes. (6) The department shall expend money from the fund, upon appropriation, only to implement the programs described under this act. (7) At the beginning of each state fiscal year, the department may increase the fees collected under this act by a percentage amount equal to not more than the average percentage wage and salary increase granted for that fiscal year to classified civil service employees employed by the department. (8) If the department increases fees under subsection (1), the increase is effective for that fiscal year. The department shall use the increased fees as the basis for calculating fee increases 1 2 3 4 5 6 in subsequent fiscal years. (9) By August 1 of each year, the department shall provide to the director of the department of technology, management, and budget and the chairpersons of the appropriations committees of the senate and house of representatives a complete schedule of fees to be collected under this act for the following fiscal year.